Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3608
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Services, the Office of Probation Administration, the State Board of Education, and the Department of Labor may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that provide for:

(1) Defining joint responsibilities in implementing the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act; and

(2) Setting minimum training standards for credible messengers and staff responsible for implementing the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act.

Laws 2026, LB962, § 8.
December 1, 2026